Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.07
Enforcement of act; inspections; testing; methods of analysis; results; distribution.

(1) To enforce the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the act, the director may:

(a) For purposes of inspection, enter any location, vehicle, or both in which commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance is manufactured, processed, packed, transported, or held for distribution during normal business hours, except that in the event that any such location or vehicle is not open to the public, the director shall present his or her credentials and obtain consent before making entry to such location or vehicle unless a search warrant has previously been obtained. Credentials shall not be required for each entry made during the period covered by the inspection. The person in charge of the location or vehicle shall be notified of the completion of the inspection. If the owner of such location or vehicle or his or her agent refuses to admit the director to inspect pursuant to this section, the director may obtain a search warrant from a court of competent jurisdiction directing such owner or agent to submit the location, vehicle, or both as described in such search warrant to inspection;

(b) Inspect any location or vehicle described in this subsection, all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers and labeling, all records, books, papers, and documents relating to the distribution and production of commercial fertilizers and beneficial substances, and other information necessary for the enforcement of the act;

(c) Obtain samples of commercial fertilizers and beneficial substances. The owner, operator, or agent in charge shall be given a receipt describing the samples obtained; and

(d) Make analyses of and test samples obtained pursuant to subdivision (c) of this subsection to determine whether such commercial fertilizers and beneficial substances are in compliance with the act.

For purposes of this subsection, location shall include a factory, warehouse, or establishment.

(2) Sampling and analysis shall be conducted in accordance with methods published by the AOAC International or in accordance with other generally recognized methods.

(3) The director, in determining for administrative purposes whether any product is deficient in plant nutrients, shall be guided solely by the official sample obtained and analyzed as provided for in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The results of official analysis of any official sample shall be forwarded by the director to the person named on the label when the official sample is not in compliance with the act or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the act. Upon request made within ninety days of the analysis, the director shall furnish to the person named on the label a portion of the official sample. Following expiration of the ninety-day period, the director may dispose of such sample.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 7, p. 1041;

Laws 1969, c. 791, § 3, p. 2997;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 8;

Laws 1980, LB 889, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 30;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 27;

Laws 2015, LB93, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 18.
March 17, 2026
"Product" under sections 81-2,162.01 to 81-2,162.07, R.R.S.1943, means the product which is sold in the normal course of business to the ultimate consumer, and consists of the finished product. "Manufacture" means manufacture of the finished product. "Distributes" means distribution of the finished product, and not a mere ingredient. PPG Industries Canada LTD v. Kreuscher, 204 Neb. 220, 281 N.W.2d 762 (1979).